Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.345.075

School districts and tribes—Education data-sharing agreements.

(1) The Washington state school directors' association, in consultation and collaboration with tribes, shall develop a model policy and procedure to establish data-sharing agreements between school districts and local tribes by January 1, 2021.

(2) In developing the model policy and procedure, the Washington state school directors' association must:

(a) Consult with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the office of native education, the tribal leaders congress on education, and local tribes;

(b) Consider model agreements developed by the bureau of Indian education and model data-sharing agreements and procedures developed by national native educational organizations; and

(c) Consider standards for the identification of native students for data-sharing purposes.

(3) The model policy and procedure developed under this section must safeguard students' personally identifiable information consistent with the requirements of the federal family educational rights and privacy act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g).

[ 2020 c 206 s 1.]